Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2612.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sgt. Jason Dale Kriedler Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Jason Dale Kriedler was born December 23, 1929, in Cambria County.(2) Sgt. Kriedler attended South Fork High School in Cambria County.(3) Outside of work, Sgt. Kriedler enjoyed working on cars.(4) Sgt. Kriedler joined the United States Army as an automotive mechanic, 2nd Echelon, as a Sergeant with B Company, 2nd Engineer Battalion, 2nd Infantry Division.(5) Sgt. Kriedler earned various honors and awards for 12345678910111213141516171819 his service, including the Combat Infantry Badge, Korean Service Medal, National Defense Service Medal, Republic of Korea Presidential Unit Citation, Republic of Korea War Service Medal, United Nations Service Medal and Purple Heart, and his name is displayed at the Cambria County War Memorial.(6) Sgt. Jason Dale Kriedler was reported missing-in-action on December 1, 1950, during the Battle of Chosin Reservoir in North Korea.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 8455, carrying U.S. Route 219 over Palestine Road in Adams Township, Cambria County, is designated as the Sgt. Jason Dale Kriedler Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2612PN3564 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617